Utah statutes.
17-30-7.   Disqualification of applicant for examination -- Appeal to commission.

(1) The commission shall disqualify an applicant for examination who:

(a)  Does not meet advertised qualifications.

(b)  Has been convicted of a criminal offense inimical to the public service, or involving moral turpitude.

(c)  Has practiced or attempted deception or fraud in his application or examination, or in securing eligibility for appointment.

(d)  Is not a citizen of the United States.

(2)  If an applicant is rejected, he shall be notified by mail at his last known address. At any time prior to the date of examination an applicant may correct a defect in his application, or appeal in writing to the commission.



Enacted by Statewide Initiative A, Nov. 8, 1960

